Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 3. Election Contests.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

15.20.540

,

15.20.550

, and

15.20.560

, when read together, clearly state intention of legislature to permit appeal to superior court under certain circumstances, but the language of these sections is permissive. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

As an alternative means of contesting an election, the legislature provided (AS

15.20.520

) for a direct appeal to the chamber in which the candidate seeks membership in accordance with the applicable rules of the legislature or Congress. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

Collateral references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 245-322.

Sec. 15.20.540.
Grounds for election contest.

A defeated candidate or 10 qualified voters may contest the nomination or election of any person or the approval or rejection of any question or proposition upon one or more of the following grounds:

malconduct, fraud, or corruption on the part of an election official sufficient to change the result of the election;

when the person certified as elected or nominated is not qualified as required by law;

any corrupt practice as defined by law sufficient to change the results of the election.

History.

(§ 4.91 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to corrupt practices, see AS 15.56.

Sec. 15.20.550.
Jurisdiction and time for contest.

The action may be brought in the superior court within 10 days after the completion of the state review.

History.

(§ 4.92 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 103 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.20.560.
Judgment of court.

The judge shall pronounce judgment on which candidate was elected or nominated and whether the question or proposition was accepted or rejected.
The director shall issue a new election certificate to correctly reflect the judgment of the court.
If the court decides that the election resulted in a tie vote, the director shall immediately proceed to determine the election by lot as is provided by law. If the court decides that no candidate was duly elected or nominated, the judgment shall be that the contested election be set aside. The provisions of this section and AS

15.20.540

and

15.20.550

are not intended to limit or interfere with the power of the legislature to judge the election and qualifications of its members.

History.

(§ 4.93 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 104 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Secs. 15.20.590 — 15.20.740.
Punch-card voting. [Repealed, § 92 ch 82 SLA 2000.]